Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1902
Legislative power.

The Legislature shall have the power to amend or repeal all or part of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to the act are governed by the amendment or repeal.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 2.